Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Article 3. Compromise and Satisfaction.

Sec. 12.45.120.
Authority to compromise misdemeanors for which victim has civil action.

If a defendant is held to answer on a charge of misdemeanor for which the person injured by the act constituting the crime has a remedy by a civil action, the crime may be compromised except when it was committed

by or upon a peace officer, judge, or magistrate while in the execution of the duties of that office;

riotously;

with an intent to commit a felony;

larcenously;

against

a spouse or a former spouse of the defendant;

a parent, grandparent, child, or grandchild of the defendant;

a member of the social unit comprised of those living together in the same dwelling as the defendant; or

a person who is not a spouse or former spouse of the defendant but who previously lived in a spousal relationship with the defendant.

History.

(§ 6.13 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 15 ch 8 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 4 SLA 1988)

Sec. 12.45.130.
Acknowledgment of satisfaction by injured party.

If the party injured appears before the court in which the defendant is bound to appear, at any time before trial, and acknowledges in writing that satisfaction has been received for the injury, the court may, on payment of the costs incurred, order the prosecution dismissed and the defendant discharged. The order is a bar to another prosecution for the same crime.

History.

(§ 6.14 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.45.140.
Compromise or stay upon compromise by other means prohibited.

A crime may not be compromised or the prosecution or punishment upon a compromise dismissed or stayed except as provided by law.

History.

(§ 6.15 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.45.150.
Order for private prosecutor to pay costs for malicious prosecution without probable cause. [Repealed, § 1 ch 19 SLA 1987.]

Sec. 12.45.155.
[Renumbered as AS 12.45.084.]

Renumbered as AS

12.45.084

.

Renumbered as AS

12.45.084

.

Sec. 12.45.160.
[Renumbered as AS 12.45.082.]

Renumbered as AS

12.45.082

.

Renumbered as AS

12.45.082

.